Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,229
Accident involving conveyance; notification required; when; state elevator inspector; duties.

The owner of a conveyance shall notify the state elevator inspector of any accident causing personal injury or property damage in excess of one thousand dollars involving a conveyance on or before the close of business the next business day following the accident, and the conveyance involved shall not operate until the state elevator inspector has conducted an investigation of the accident and has approved the operation of the conveyance. The state elevator inspector shall investigate and report to the State Fire Marshal the cause of any conveyance accident that may occur in the state, the loss of life, the injuries sustained, and such other data as may be of benefit in preventing other similar accidents.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2520;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 65.